Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-603
Streets and highways; use.

Any city or village that constructs subways or viaducts as provided in section 18-601 may appropriate an existing street or highway for such subway or viaduct and may acquire, extend, widen, or enlarge any street or highway for such purpose.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 34, § 3, p. 197;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1903;

R.S.1943, § 18-603;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 45.